Wisconsin, session 2025, SB460.
do enact as follows:SB460,11Section 1. 102.03 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB460,2,122102.03 (2) Where such Except as provided in this subsection, when those 3conditions exist the right to the recovery of compensation under this chapter shall 4be the exclusive remedy against the employer, any other employee of the same 5employer, and the worker’s compensation insurance carrier. This section does not 6limit the right of an employee to bring action against any coemployee for an assault 7intended to cause bodily harm, or against a coemployee for negligent operation of a 8motor vehicle not owned or leased by the employer, against the employer or a 9coemployee for an unlawful employment practice under s. 103.08 (3), or against a 10coemployee of the same employer to the extent that there would be liability of a 11governmental unit to pay judgments against employees under a collective 12bargaining agreement or a local ordinance.SB460,21Section 2. 102.80 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB460,3,22102.80 (1) (dm) Amounts received under s. 103.08 (6) (a) 1.SB460,33Section 3. 102.81 (4g) of the statutes is created to read:SB460,3,114102.81 (4g) If an injured employee who received one or more payments under 5sub. (1) begins an action against the employee’s employer or a coemployee under s. 6103.08 (3) for an unlawful employment practice arising out of the same underlying 7behavior as the behavior giving rise to the injury that is compensable under sub. (1), 8the injured employee shall provide to the department a copy of all papers filed by 9any party to the action. If the injured employee is awarded medical expenses, back 10pay, or front pay under s. 103.08 (5) (a), the employer shall reimburse the 11department as provided in s. 103.08 (6) (a) 1.SB460,412Section 4. 102.81 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB460,3,1413102.81 (5) The department of justice may bring an action to collect a payment 14under sub. (4) (b) or (c) or (4g).SB460,515Section 5. 102.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB460,4,216102.82 (1) Except as provided in sub. (2) (ar), an uninsured employer shall 17reimburse the department for any payment made under s. 102.81 (1) to or on behalf 18of an employee of the uninsured employer or to an employee’s dependents and for 19any expenses paid by the department in administering the claim of the employee or 20dependents, less amounts repaid by the uninsured employer, employee, or 21dependents under s. 102.81 (4) (b) or (c) or (4g). The reimbursement owed under 22this subsection is due within 30 days after the date on which the department 1notifies the uninsured employer that the reimbursement is owed. Interest shall 2accrue on amounts not paid when due at the rate of 1 percent per month.SB460,63Section 6. 103.08 of the statutes is created to read:SB460,4,44103.08 Abusive work environments. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB460,4,135(a) “Abusive conduct” means conduct, including acts or omissions, by an 6employer or employee that a reasonable person would find to be abusive on the basis 7of the severity, nature, and frequency of the conduct. “Abusive conduct” includes 8repeated infliction of verbal abuse such as derogatory remarks, insults, and 9epithets; verbal, nonverbal, or physical conduct that is threatening, intimidating, or 10humiliating; sabotage or undermining of an employee’s work performance; or, as an 11aggravating factor, exploitation of an employee’s known psychological or physical 12illness or disability. “Abusive conduct” does not include a single act unless that act 13is especially severe or egregious.SB460,4,1714(b) “Abusive work environment” means a work environment in which an 15employer or one or more of its employees, acting with intent to cause pain or 16distress to an employee, subjects that employee to abusive conduct that causes 17physical harm or psychological harm to that employee.SB460,4,2318(c) “Adverse employment action” means an action taken by an employer with 19respect to an employee that has the effect, in whole or in part, of a penalty, 20including dismissal or suspension from employment, demotion, denial of a 21promotion, unfavorable transfer or reassignment, reduction in compensation, or 22denial of increased compensation. “Adverse employment action” also includes a 23constructive discharge.SB460,5,21(d) “Aggrieved employee” means an employee who brings an action under sub. 2(3) alleging that he or she has been injured by an unlawful employment practice.SB460,5,73(e) “Constructive discharge” means a situation in which an employee resigns 4from employment because the employee reasonably believes that he or she was 5subjected to an abusive work environment and, prior to the employee resigning, the 6employer was aware of the abusive conduct that gave rise to the abusive work 7environment and the employer failed to stop the abusive conduct.SB460,5,98(f) Notwithstanding s. 103.001 (5), “employee” means an individual employed 9by an employer.SB460,5,1510(g) Notwithstanding s. 103.001 (6), “employer” means a person engaging in 11any activity, enterprise, or business in this state that employs one or more persons 12on a permanent basis. “Employer” includes the state and any office, department, 13independent agency, authority, institution, association, society, or other body in 14state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, 15including the legislature and the courts.SB460,5,1716(h) “Physical harm” means the impairment of an individual’s physical health 17or bodily integrity.SB460,5,1918(i) “Psychological harm” means the impairment of an individual’s mental 19health.SB460,5,2120(j) “Retaliate” means to take an action that negatively affects the terms, 21conditions, and privileges of an employee’s employment.SB460,5,2322(k) “Unlawful employment practice” means an unlawful employment practice 23prohibited under sub. (2) (a) or (b).SB460,6,31(2) Abusive work environment prohibited. (a) It is an unlawful 2employment practice for an employer or employee to subject an employee to an 3abusive work environment.SB460,6,64(b) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer or employee to 5retaliate or threaten to retaliate in any manner against an employee for any of the 6following reasons:SB460,6,771. The employee opposed an unlawful employment practice.SB460,6,1182. The employee initiated, testified in, assisted in, or in any other manner 9participated in an investigation, action, or proceeding to enforce a right under this 10section, including any internal investigation or proceeding, any mediation or 11arbitration proceeding, or any court action.SB460,6,13123. The employer believes that the employee engaged in conduct described in 13subd. 1. or 2.SB460,6,1514(c) The prohibitions under pars. (a) and (b) may be enforced only by a civil 15cause of action brought under sub. (3).SB460,6,2216(3) Civil action. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, an 17employee who alleges that he or she has been injured by an unlawful employment 18practice may bring an action in circuit court against the employer and, if applicable, 19the employee who allegedly engaged in the unlawful employment practice for any 20relief under sub. (5) the court considers appropriate. An employee must commence 21an action under this subsection within one year after the last act constituting the 22unlawful employment practice occurred or be barred from commencing an action.SB460,7,223(4) Affirmative defenses. (a) If the alleged unlawful employment practice 1did not result in an adverse employment action against the aggrieved employee, the 2employer may plead as an affirmative defense that all of the following are true:SB460,7,431. The employer exercised reasonable care to prevent and promptly correct the 4abusive conduct that is the basis for the aggrieved employee’s cause of action.SB460,7,752. The aggrieved employee unreasonably failed to take advantage of 6appropriate preventive or corrective opportunities the employer provided to prevent 7or correct the abusive conduct described under subd. 1.SB460,7,118(b) If the alleged unlawful employment practice resulted in an adverse 9employment action against the aggrieved employee, the employer may plead as an 10affirmative defense that the aggrieved employee’s complaint is based on any of the 11following:SB460,7,14121. An adverse employment action that was reasonably taken for poor 13performance or misconduct by the aggrieved employee or for the employer’s 14economic necessity.SB460,7,16152. An adverse employment action that was taken in response to a reasonable 16performance evaluation of the aggrieved employee.SB460,7,18173. A reasonable investigation of a potentially illegal or unethical activity by 18the aggrieved employee.SB460,7,2219(c) An employee who is alleged to have engaged in an unlawful employment 20practice may plead as an affirmative defense that the employee engaged in that 21practice at the direction of the employer under an actual or implied threat of an 22adverse employment action against the employee for not engaging in that practice.SB460,8,1123(5) Relief. (a) Subject to par. (b) and sub. (6) (a) 1., if the circuit court finds 1that an employer or employee has engaged in an unlawful employment practice, the 2court may enjoin the employer or employee from engaging in that practice and may 3grant other relief the court considers appropriate, including reinstatement of the 4aggrieved employee, removal of the person who engaged in the abusive conduct 5giving rise to the unlawful employment practice from the aggrieved employee’s 6work area, medical expenses, back pay, front pay, compensation for pain and 7suffering, compensation for emotional distress, punitive damages under s. 895.043, 8and, notwithstanding s. 814.04, reasonable costs and attorney fees. If the circuit 9court orders any payment under this paragraph because of an unlawful 10employment practice engaged in by an employee, the employer of the employee who 11engaged in an unlawful employment practice is liable for that payment.SB460,8,1512(b) If an employer is found to have engaged in an unlawful employment 13practice that did not result in an adverse employment action against the aggrieved 14employee, the employer is not liable for compensation for emotional distress or 15punitive damages unless the abusive conduct was extreme and outrageous.SB460,8,1716(6) Effect on other laws. (a) This section does not relieve any person from 17any duty, liability, or penalty provided by any other law except as follows:SB460,9,6181. If the worker’s compensation insurer of an employer that is ordered to pay 19medical expenses under sub. (5) (a) or the department, if the employer is uninsured, 20has paid or is obligated to pay medical expenses under ch. 102 for an injury arising 21out of the same underlying behavior as the behavior giving rise to the unlawful 22employment practice for which the employer is liable, or if the worker’s 23compensation insurer of an employer that is ordered to pay back pay or front pay 1under sub. (5) (a) or the department, if the employer is uninsured, has paid or is 2obligated to pay disability benefits under ch. 102 for such an injury for the same 3period as back or front pay is awarded under sub. (5) (a), the court shall order the 4employer to reimburse the insurer or department for the amount of those expenses 5or benefits paid or payable and to pay to the aggrieved employee any balance of the 6amount awarded under sub. (5) (a) remaining after that reimbursement. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb460 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb460 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB460 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB460 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB460: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting